Maine, session 132, LD1290.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 32 MRSA §14352, sub-§4-A is enacted to read:
4-A. Board of Certification for the Athletic Trainer. "Board of Certification for
the Athletic Trainer" means the national credentialing organization for the entry-level
athletic training profession or its successor organization approved by the department.
Sec. 2. 32 MRSA §14356, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 1995, c. 275, §1, is amended
to read:
2. Student athletic trainer Athletic training student. A person fulfilling the
requirements for licensure or pursuing a supervised course of study leading to a degree or
certificate in athletic training at an accredited or approved educational program if the
person is designated by a title that indicates that person's status as a student or trainee;
Sec. 3. 32 MRSA §14356, sub-§4, as enacted by PL 1995, c. 275, §1, is amended
to read:
4. Visiting team. A person performing athletic training services in the State for an
out-of-state team that is in the State for competition at which an athletic trainer licensed
under this chapter or a physician is available if these services are performed for no more
than 4 14 days at a time or for no more than 30 days a year.
Sec. 4. 32 MRSA §14357, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2007, c. 402, Pt. JJ, §§4 and
5, is further amended to read:
1. Qualifications. To qualify for a license as an athletic trainer an applicant must:
A. Demonstrate that the applicant is trustworthy and competent to engage in practice
as an athletic trainer in a manner that safeguards the interests of the public;
B. Be a graduate of a college or university approved by the department and have
successfully completed that college's or university's curriculum in athletic training or
other curricula acceptable to the department and have completed an athletic training
education program approved by the National Athletic Trainers' Association or its
Page 1 - 132LR1878(03)

successor or other organization approved by the department or a program of practical
training in athletic training acceptable to the department; and
C. Have passed the National Athletic Trainers' Association Board of Certification
examination or be currently certified by the National Athletic Trainers' Association or
its successor or other organization approved by the department.
D. Have passed the examination of the Board of Certification for the Athletic Trainer;
and
E. Hold a current credential from the Board of Certification for the Athletic Trainer.
Sec. 5. 32 MRSA §14359, 2nd ¶, as amended by PL 2007, c. 402, Pt. JJ, §7, is
further amended to read:
For the purposes of satisfying the continuing education requirements, each application
for license renewal must include current certification by the National Athletic Trainers'
Association or its successor or other organization approved by the department Board of
Certification for the Athletic Trainer.
Sec. 6. 32 MRSA §14360, as amended by PL 2007, c. 402, Pt. JJ, §8, is repealed.
Sec. 7. 32 MRSA §14361-A, sub-§4, as enacted by PL 2007, c. 402, Pt. JJ, §10, is
amended to read:
4. Unethical conduct. A finding by the National Athletic Trainers' Association's
Ethics Committee of a violation of the National Athletic Trainers' Association's Code of
Ethics or a finding by the National Athletic Trainers' Association's Board of Certification's
Professional Practice and Discipline Committee of a violation of the Board of
Certification's Standards of Professional Practice the Board of Certification for the Athletic
Trainer of a violation of that board's practice standards and code of professional
responsibility or findings by successor or other organizations with respect to codes of ethics
approved by the department.
Page 2 - 132LR1878(03)